Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.130

Procedure upon plea of guilty or not guilty to information allegations—Notice—Adjudicatory and disposition hearing—Disposition standards used in sentencing.

(1) The respondent shall be advised of the allegations in the information and shall be required to plead guilty or not guilty to the allegation(s). The state or the respondent may make preliminary motions up to the time of the plea.

(2) If the respondent pleads guilty, the court may proceed with disposition or may continue the case for a dispositional hearing. If the respondent denies guilt, an adjudicatory hearing date shall be set. The court shall notify the parent, guardian, or custodian who has custody of a juvenile described in the charging document of the dispositional or adjudicatory hearing and shall require attendance.

(3) At the adjudicatory hearing it shall be the burden of the prosecution to prove the allegations of the information beyond a reasonable doubt.

(4) The court shall record its findings of fact and shall enter its decision upon the record. Such findings shall set forth the evidence relied upon by the court in reaching its decision.

(5) If the respondent is found not guilty he or she shall be released from detention.

(6) If the respondent is found guilty the court may immediately proceed to disposition or may continue the case for a dispositional hearing. Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in open court. If notice is not given in open court to a party, the party and the parent, guardian, or custodian who has custody of the juvenile shall be notified by mail of the time and place of the continued hearing.

(7) The court following an adjudicatory hearing may request that a predisposition study be prepared to aid the court in its evaluation of the matters relevant to disposition of the case.

(8) The disposition hearing shall be held within fourteen days after the adjudicatory hearing or plea of guilty unless good cause is shown for further delay, or within twenty-one days if the juvenile is not held in a detention facility, unless good cause is shown for further delay.

(9) In sentencing an offender, the court shall use the disposition standards in effect on the date of the offense.

(10) A person notified under this section who fails without reasonable cause to appear and abide by the order of the court may be proceeded against as for contempt of court. In determining whether a parent, guardian, or custodian had reasonable cause not to appear, the court may consider all factors relevant to the person's ability to appear as summoned.

[ 1997 c 338 s 22; 1981 c 299 s 10; 1979 c 155 s 65; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 67.]

NOTES:

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.